Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.20, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Employer workforce training refunds. new text end new text begin (a) An employer subject to the requirements of subdivision 1 that employs 100 or fewer employees may annually request from the commissioner a refund of the special assessment amounts that the employer paid into the workforce development fund. Money refunded under this subdivision must be used for employee training as provided under paragraph (b). The amounts necessary to provide the refunds under this paragraph are annually appropriated to the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) Training provided by an employer funded by the refund allowed under this subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) must be used to upskill current entry-level employees or for training that leads to an increased salary or increased opportunities for career advancement with the employer; and new text end new text begin (2) must only be used to train Minnesota employees. new text end new text begin (c) By January 15, 2026, and each January 15 thereafter, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees with jurisdiction over workforce development providing the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the current balance in the workforce development fund; and new text end new text begin (2) for the previous calendar year: new text end new text begin (i) the total amount of special assessments collected; and new text end new text begin (ii) the total amount of money refunded to employers under this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end